Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2007
Uniform; badge.

The subordinate officers of the Nebraska State Patrol, when on duty, shall be dressed in distinctive uniform and display a badge of office, except that the superintendent may authorize not more than thirty-five percent of such officers to be on duty without wearing a distinct uniform. The superintendent shall issue to each member of the Nebraska State Patrol a serially numbered badge of office with the seal of this state in the center thereof, the words Nebraska State Patrol encircling the seal, and containing the designation of the position held by the subordinate officer.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 9, p. 509;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 11, p. 693;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-424;

R.S.1943, § 60-438;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-438;

Laws 1986, LB 851, § 16.